Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.112

Voters without traditional residential addresses.

(1) No person registering to vote, who meets all the qualifications of a registered voter in the state of Washington, shall be disqualified because he or she lacks a traditional residential address. A voter who lacks a traditional residential address will be registered and assigned to a precinct based on the location provided.

(2) For the purposes of this section, a voter who resides in a shelter, park, motor home, marina, unmarked home, or other identifiable location that the voter deems to be his or her residence lacks a traditional address. A voter who registers under this section must provide a valid mailing address, and must still meet the requirement in Article VI, section 1 of the state Constitution that he or she live in the area for at least thirty days before the election.

(3) A nontraditional residential address may be used when a voter resides on an Indian reservation or on Indian lands.

(4) A federally recognized tribe may designate one or more tribal government buildings to serve as a residential address or mailing address or both for voters living on an Indian reservation or on Indian lands. However, a voter may not use a tribally designated building as the voter's residential address if the building is in a different precinct than where the voter lives.

(5) A person who has a traditional residential address and does not reside on an Indian reservation or on Indian lands must use that address for voter registration purposes and is not eligible to register under this section.

[ 2019 c 6 s 2; 2006 c 320 s 3; 2005 c 246 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 246: See note following RCW 10.64.140.